Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2136.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3304.1. Diagnoses prior to incarceration.(a) Prohibition.--Except as provided for under subsection (b), the department may not in any manner remove or refuse to recognize a diagnosis for any medical condition made by a health care practitioner as defined under section 103 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, prior to the incarceration of the individual.(b) Exception.--The health care practitioner who made the diagnosis, or a health care practitioner with medical expertise on the diagnosed medical condition in question who is not 1234567891011121314151617 employed by or affiliated with the department, may provide to the department a written statement recommending the removal of a diagnosis made prior to the incarceration of the individual. Upon receipt of the written statement, the department may remove the diagnosis of the medical condition in question.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2136PN2761 - 2 - 123456